Arkansas, session 2025, HB1550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 356, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-356-103. Expedited security screening — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Airline" means an organization providing a regular public
service of commercial air transportation on one (1) or more routes;
(2) "Expedited security screening" means a service provided by a
vendor at a public airport that allows a person to use a standard security
lane or a United States Transportation Security Administration PreCheck
Program lane for the purpose of a security screening instead of the standard
security screening provided at the public airport;
(3)(A) “Public airport” means a tract of land or water owned by
a governmental entity with buildings and facilities for the landing, takeoff,
shelter, supply, and repair of aircraft.
(B) "Public airport" includes without limitation:
(i) Appurtenant areas used or intended to be used
for operations, maintenance, storage, or rights-of-way;
(ii) A county airport;
*ZRC052*
02/20/2025 1:34:28 PM ZRC052

HB1550
(iii) A municipal airport; and
(iv) A regional airport;
(4) "Public airport operator" means a person or entity that is
authorized to manage or run a public airport, including without limitation an
airport authority, fixed-base operator, or other agency; and
(5) "Vendor" means a private third-party vendor that provides an
expedited security screening.
(b) A public airport operator may enter into an agreement with a
vendor to provide an expedited security screening only if the vendor has
obtained a dedicated Transportation Security Administration security lane at
the public airport operated by the public airport operator exclusively to
provide an expedited security screening.
(c)(1) A public airport operator may enter into an agreement with an
airline to provide an expedited security screening offered by an airline for
exclusive use by passengers of the airline.
(2) An agreement between a public airport operator and an
airline to provide an expedited security screening for the exclusive use of
passengers of the airline shall not require a passenger using the expedited
security screening to pay an additional fee to a vendor.

Section 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Retroactivity.
This act applies retroactively to all agreements entered into by a
public airport operator on or after January 1, 2025.













02/20/2025 1:34:28 PM ZRC052